Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.080

Vacation or restriction of nonintervention powers following insolvency—Notice—Determinations affecting prior grants of nonintervention powers upon petition—Endorsement on prior orders.

(1) Within ten days after the personal representative has received from alleged creditors under chapter 11.40 RCW claims that have an aggregate face value that, when added to the other debts and to the taxes and expenses of greater priority under applicable law, would appear to cause the estate to be insolvent, the personal representative shall notify in writing all beneficiaries under the decedent's will and, if any of the decedent's property will pass according to the laws of intestate succession, all heirs, together with any unpaid creditors, other than a creditor whose claim is then barred under chapter 11.40 RCW or the otherwise applicable statute of limitations, that the estate might be insolvent. The personal representative shall file a copy of the written notice with the court.

(2) Within ten days after an estate becomes insolvent, the personal representative shall petition under RCW 11.96A.080 for a determination of whether the court should reaffirm, rescind, or restrict in whole or in part any prior grant of nonintervention powers. Notice of the hearing must be given in accordance with RCW 11.96A.110.

(3) If, upon a petition under RCW 11.96A.080 of any personal representative, beneficiary under the decedent's will, heir if any of the decedent's property passes according to the laws of intestate succession, or any unpaid creditor with a claim that has been accepted or judicially determined to be enforceable, the court determines that the decedent's estate is insolvent, the court shall reaffirm, rescind, or restrict in whole or in part any prior grant of nonintervention powers to the extent necessary to protect the best interests of the beneficiaries and creditors of the estate.

(4) If the court rescinds or restricts a prior grant of nonintervention powers, the court shall endorse the term "powers rescinded" or "powers restricted" upon the prior order together with the date of the endorsement.

[ 1999 c 42 s 615; 1997 c 252 s 65; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 24; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.